tests/ger1.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Fall of м in ger1 (%>м%{А%}), but м does not fall e.g. in <neg><pres> (%>м%{А%}с%>т)":
    вула<v><tv><ger1> : вулама
    ӗҫле<v><iv><ger1> : ӗҫлеме
    пул<v><iv><ger1> : пулма
    ил<v><iv><ger1> : илме
    вула<v><tv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : вуламасть
    ӗҫле<v><iv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : ӗҫлемест
    пул<v><iv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : пулмасть
    ил<v><iv><neg><pres><p3><sg> : илмест
